Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 2. Area and Seasonal Restrictions

§ 28.2-408.
Food fish not to be taken, bought, or sold; percentage allowable; penalty.

It is unlawful to take, catch or round up with purse net, for any purpose, food fish in an amount greater than one percent of the whole catch. If food fish represent more than one percent of the whole catch, the net shall be opened immediately and the food fish released while alive.

It is unlawful for any vessel licensed for the purpose of menhaden fishing to catch any food fish for the purpose of marketing; for any person to have in his possession food fish in an amount greater than one percent of the bulk for the purpose of manufacturing them into fertilizer, fish meal, or oil; or for any person to use in any manner any food fish, in an amount greater than one percent of the bulk for the purpose of fertilizing or improving the soil.

Any person violating any provision of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, and the license on such person’s boat or net shall be revoked by court order for the remainder of the season.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-60; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-58; 1964, c. 393; 1966, c. 696; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-409.
Menhaden fishing prohibited in certain areas; exception.

Except as provided in subsection B of this section, it shall be unlawful to take or catch menhaden with purse nets in the following waters:

In the Piankatank River and its tributaries above and west of a line beginning at the northernmost, as measured from the low-water mark, edge of land known as Gwynn’s Island at or near the mouth of Kibble Pond, thence in a northerly direction in a straight line to the easternmost edge of high land on Stingray Point;

In the Rappahannock River and its tributaries above and west of the R.O. Norris, Jr., Bridge;

In the York River and its tributaries above and west of a line extending northwardly from the western line of Goodwin Islands through the western line of Ellen Island to the northern bank of the York;

In the East, North, Ware and Severn Rivers and their tributaries; and

In Cape Charles harbor eastward of a line from the western tip of the jetty on the southern side of the channel to the westernmost tip of the jetty on the northern side of the channel; in Kings Creek and Cherrystone inlet eastward of a line from the western end of the jetty on the north side of Cape Charles harbor to the southern end of Wescoat Point; in Mattawoman and Hungars Creek eastward of a line from the northwesternmost tip of land in Old Town Neck to Great Neck Point; in Nassawadox Creek eastward of a line from Shooting Point to Nassawadox Point; in Occohannock Creek eastward of a line from Sparrow Point to the southernmost tip of Powells Bluff; in Nandua Creek eastward of a line from the northernmost point of Milbys Point to the southwesternmost point of land in Hacks Neck, said line having a true bearing of 027°; in Pungoteague Creek eastward of a line from Bluff Point to the southeasternmost point of Finneys Island; in Onancock Creek eastward of a line from Thicket Point to Ware Point; in Chesconessex Creek eastward of a line from the northernmost point of Sound Beach to the northwesternmost point of Beach Island; in Deep Creek, Hunting Creek and Guilford Creek eastward of a line from the easternmost tip of Russel Island to Halfmoon Point to Peters Point to Simpson Point to Flood Point to Ebb Point to the mouth of Great Gut; in Messongo Creek eastward of a line from South Point to North Point in the Virginia portion of the Pocomoke River northeast of a line from Long Point to Virginia-Maryland spar buoy “A”; in the Great Wicomico River from the mouth of Whay’s Creek to Sandy Point; in Dividing Creek, Prentice Creek and Jarvis Creek westward of a line from Hughlett Point to Jarvis Point; in Indian Creek and Henrys Creek westward of a line from the southeasternmost point of land on the eastern side of the mouth of Henrys Creek to the easternmost point of Fleets Bay Neck; in Dymers Creek westward of a line from the southernmost point of Grog Island to the easternmost point of Poplar Neck; in Tabbs Creek westward of the line across the mouth of the creek at its narrowest point; in Horn Harbor and Dyer Creek westward of a line from the southernmost tip of Beach Point to the northernmost point on the south side of the mouth of Dyer Creek; in Back Creek, Clarkston Creek, Chisman Creek, Poquoson River, Bennett Creek, and adjacent waters westward of a line from the southeasternmost point of Goodwin Islands to the westernmost point of Cow Island; in Back River westward of a line from Plumtree Point to the westernmost point of Northend Point; in Little Creek southward of a line from the north point of the west jetty to the north point of the east jetty; in Lynnhaven Bay southward of the Lynnhaven Inlet Bridge on U.S. Route 60.

During the period from the first Monday in May through the third Friday in November, vessels under seventy gross tons which are licensed in accordance with subdivision 1 of §

28.2-402

are authorized to take or catch menhaden in the following waters: in the Rappahannock River eastward and southward from a line extending from Towles Point to Burnham Wharf and from Orchard Point to Towles Point; in Dividing Creek eastward from a line extending from Jarvis Point to Ditchley Pump House; in Indian Creek eastward from a line directly across the creek at Rappahannock Oyster Company; in Dymers Creek eastward from a line directly across the creek at the eastern end of Standard Products dock.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-61; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-59; 1966, c. 695; 1974, c. 313; 1978, cc. 347, 358; 1979, c. 274; 1980, c. 605; 1982, c. 461; 1988, c. 710; 1992, c. 836.

§ 28.2-410.
Closed season for menhaden fishing; forbidden nets; penalty.

Except as provided in §

28.2-409

or as otherwise provided by regulation, it is unlawful for any person to take or catch with a purse net in the waters of the Commonwealth, or waters within its jurisdiction, menhaden between the Saturday following the third Friday in November and the Sunday preceding the first Monday in May. However, in the waters east of the Chesapeake Bay Bridge Tunnel within the three-mile limit of the Virginia shoreline such prohibition shall be between the Friday before Christmas and the Sunday preceding the first Monday in May. It is also unlawful for any person to use any purse net or other net having a stretched mesh of less than one and three quarters inches. Any person violating any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 28-64, 28-67; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-65; 1966, c. 684; 1972, c. 424; 1976, c. 384; 1978, c. 347; 1982, c. 461; 1988, c. 710; 1992, c. 836; 2020, cc. 201, 356.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by c. 201, effective March 8, 2020, and c. 356, effective March 12, 2020, are identical, and in the first sentence, inserted “or as otherwise provided by regulation” and substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 28.2-411.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 201 and 356, cl. 2, effective March 8, 2020.

Editor’s note.

Former §

28.2-411

, limiting season for vessels of less than seventy gross tons and penalty for violations, derived from Acts 1982, c. 461, § 28.1-65.1; 1988, c. 710; 1992, c. 836.